Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1139.02
Repealed. Laws 2026, LB905, § 69.

This section was amended by Laws 2026, LB1048, section 19, and repealed by Laws 2026, LB905, section 69. The repeal by LB905 became operative on July 1, 2026, and the section has been deleted.